New York, session 2025-2026, A3682.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. The legislature finds and declares 2 that there is a present need to establish New York standards with 3 respect to levels of ambient lead and levels of lead contamination in 4 soils and on floors and window sills. The legislature finds that the 5 current regulatory standards are inadequate to protect the general 6 public and particularly small children from the harmful effects of 7 ingesting or inhaling lead dust, often resulting from lead paint, and 8 coming into contact with lead on exposed surfaces. The legislature 9 declares that it shall be the responsibility of the commissioner of 10 environmental conservation, in consultation with the commissioner of 11 health, to adopt standards for ambient lead and lead contamination of 12 soil and windows and floors, in a manner that would be fully protective 13 of children's health, and in accordance with the procedures set forth in 14 the environmental conservation law. 15 § 2. No later than one hundred eighty days from the effective date of 16 this act, the departments of environmental conservation and health shall 17 adopt and promulgate new standards, and update any existing standards as 18 appropriate, for dust lead hazards, soil-lead hazards and ambient air 19 quality standards for the level of lead in various media that will 20 result in blood lead levels that are no higher than a target that is EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00259-03-5 A. 3682--A 2 1 fully protective of human health and which at a minimum include consid- 2 eration of recommendations from the centers for disease control, which 3 shall in no event be less stringent than the standards set forth in 40 4 CFR Part 745, as of January 13, 2025. 5 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 6 have become a law and shall expire one year after such effective date 7 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be repealed. 8 Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule 9 or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its effec- 10 tive date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 11 date.